Tennessee, session 114, SB0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-30-103, is amended by deleting
the language "An ADS-operated vehicle may drive or operate on streets and highways in this
state with the ADS engaged without a human driver physically present" and substituting instead
the language "Except as provided in subsection (b), an ADS-operated vehicle may drive or
operate on streets and highways in this state with the ADS engaged without a human driver
physically present", and by designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the
following new subsection:
(b) An ADS-operated vehicle used to transport property for hire or compensation
in interstate commerce or to transport passengers for hire or compensation must not
drive or operate on streets and highways in this state with the ADS engaged unless:
(1) A human driver is in the driver's seat who:
(A) Is monitoring performance of the vehicle at all times;
(B) Can intervene to exercise physical control of the vehicle, if
necessary; and
(C) Holds a valid driver license for the type or class of vehicle
being driven; and
(2) The vehicle meets the conditions of subsection (a).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0310
001698
- 1 -